Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1294.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 15(b)(1) of the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act, is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 15 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, NO.174), KNOWN AS THE PRIVATE LICENSED SCHOOLS ACT, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:Section 15. Penalties.* * *(b) Civil penalty.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), in addition to any other penalty provided in this act, the board may, by a majority vote of its statutorily authorized membership, levy a civil <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 penalty of up to [$2,500] $25,000 on any licensee who violates any provision of this act or any person who operates a private licensed school without being properly licensed under this act. A civil penalty may only be assessed once per violation. Prior to the collection of the penalty, the licensee or person shall have access to the hearing procedure provided in Title 2 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes (relating to administrative law and procedure).* * *(B.1) UNLICENSED TRAINING SCHOOLS AND PROGRAMS.--IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY PROVIDED IN THIS ACT, THE BOARD MAY, BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF ITS STATUTORILY AUTHORIZED MEMBERSHIP, LEVY A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO $25,000 ON ANY PERSON WHO PROVIDES TRAINING WITHOUT BEING PROPERLY LICENSED UNDER THIS ACT. A CIVIL PENALTY MAY ONLY BE ASSESSED ONCE PER VIOLATION. PRIOR TO THE COLLECTION OF THE PENALTY, THE PERSON SHALL HAVE ACCESS TO THE HEARING PROCEDURE PROVIDED IN TITLE 2 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1294PN1682 - 2 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920